Utah statutes.
19-9-102.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Authority" means the Hazardous Waste Facilities Authority created
pursuant to Section 19-9-104.
(2)  "Board" means the Solid and Hazardous Waste Control Board created
pursuant to Section 19-1-106.
(3)  "Disposal" means the final disposition of hazardous wastes into or onto
the lands, waters, and air of this state.
(4)  "Hazardous waste" has the same meaning as defined in Section 19-6-102.
(5)  "Hazardous waste treatment, disposal, and storage facility" means a
facility or site used or intended to be used for the treatment, storage, or
disposal of hazardous waste, including physical, chemical, or thermal
processing systems, incinerators, and secure landfills.
(6)  "Obligations" means any notes, debentures, interim certificates, mortgage
certificates, revenue bonds, or other evidence of financial indebtedness, but
does not mean any general obligation bonds.
(7)  "Site" means land used for the treatment, disposal, or storage of
hazardous waste.
(8)  "Storage" means the containment of hazardous waste for a period of more
than 90 days.
(9)  "Treatment" means any method, technique, or process designed to change
the physical, chemical, or biological character or composition of any
hazardous waste to neutralize or render it nonhazardous, safer for transport,
amenable to recovery or storage, convertible to another usable material, or
reduced in volume and suitable for ultimate disposal.
